Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.631

Bridge-funding programs—Establishment and administration.

To support the formation of companies created around the technologies developed at state universities, the state universities are authorized to establish and administer bridge-funding programs for start-up companies using funds from the federal government and the private sector.

[ 2010 1st sp.s. c 14 s 2.]